Florida, session 2026, HB685.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Effective January 1, 2027, section 500.072,
Florida Statutes, is created to read:
500.072 Fortification of enriched grain products.—
(1)(a) The Legislature finds that:
1. Neural tube defects, including spina bifida and
anencephaly, are serious birth defects of the brain and spine
that occur early in pregnancy and cause lifelong disability and
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb685-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 685 2026
substantial health care costs.
2. The United States Food and Drug Administration mandated
folic acid fortification of wheat flour and other grain products
in 1996, leading to a significant reduction in rates of neural
tube defects nationally.
3. Minority populations in this state disproportionately
consume corn masa and white rice, which are not consistently
fortified with folic acid, contributing to persistently higher
rates of neural tube defects among these populations.
4. In this state, an average of 2.5 cases of spina bifida
per 10,000 live births were reported from 2016 to 2021, with
Hernando, Escambia, and Marion Counties exceeding state averages
with 8.9 cases, 6.3 cases, and 5.8 cases per 10,000 live births,
respectively.
5. Each case of spina bifida carries an estimated lifetime
medical and social cost of $800,000 to $1.4 million, much of
which is borne by Florida Medicaid and other public programs.
6. Fortifying grain products with folic acid is a proven,
cost-effective preventive measure that can avert cases of neural
tube defects, reduce long-term public expenditures related to
such defects, and promote health across communities in this
state.
7. Early folic acid intake has been associated with
reduced risk for certain neurodevelopmental conditions, adding
further potential public health benefit.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb685-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 685 2026
(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to reduce the
incidence of neural tube defects and increase vitamin intake
across this state in order to decrease the public health and
fiscal burden associated with preventable birth defects and
other associated negative health outcomes.
(2) As used in this section, the term:
(a) "Corn masa" means a doughlike food product made from
corn that has undergone nixtamalization.
(b) "Corn masa product" means a food product primarily
made from corn masa or corn masa flour.
(c) "White rice product" means a white rice or white rice-
derived food product.
(3)(a) All enriched grain products, including wheat flour,
corn flour, breads, cereals, corn masa, corn masa flour, corn
masa products, and white rice products, offered for human
consumption in this state must contain folic acid.
1. Corn masa flour must be enriched in an amount not less
than 0.7 milligrams of folic acid, within an acceptable industry
standard deviation of error, per pound of corn masa flour.
2. A corn masa product or white rice product must be
enriched in an amount not less than 0.4 milligrams of folic
acid, within an acceptable industry standard deviation of error,
per pound of corn masa product or white rice product.
(b) Products under this subsection must be clearly labeled
as containing folic acid in accordance with United States Food
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb685-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 685 2026
and Drug Administration guidelines.
(4) This section does not apply to products that are:
(a) Produced by cottage food operations as defined in s.
500.03(1); or
(b) Certified organic.
(5) A violation of subsection (3) is grounds for
disciplinary action under s. 500.121.
(6) The department, in coordination with the Department of
Health, shall enforce this section. The departments may adopt
rules necessary to implement this section, including rules on
protocols for enriched grain products inspections and on grain
products enrichment compliance reporting.
Section 2. The Department of Health shall submit a report
to the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives by January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter,
detailing the implementation of s. 500.072, Florida Statutes,
and any observed reductions in the incidence of neural tube
defects related to such implementation.
Section 3. For the 2026–2027 fiscal year, the sum of
$250,000 in nonrecurring funds is appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund to the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
Services for the purpose of implementing s. 500.072, Florida
Statutes, including enriched grain products inspections and
public education efforts on public health benefits of the intake
100 of folic acid.
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb685-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 685 2026
101 Section 4. Except as otherwise expressly provided in this
102 act, this act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb685-00